Oklahoma, session 2026, HB2200.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 1740.2, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1740.2. A. As used in this section:
1. "Mail" means a letter, postal card, package, bag or any
other article or thing contained therein, or other sealed article
addressed to a person, that:
a. is delivered by a common carrier or delivery service
and not yet received by the addressee, or
b. has been left to be collected for delivery by a common
carrier or delivery service; and
2. "Person" means an individual, partnership, corporation,
limited liability company, association or other legal entity.
Req. No. 11059 Page 1

B. It shall be unlawful for any person to hold, conceal,
destroy or take mail from the mailbox or premises of another person
or from a delivery vehicle at any point throughout the delivery
route without the effective consent of the addressee and with the
intent to deprive the addressee of the mail.
C. Any person who violates the provisions of this section
shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a misdemeanor felony punishable
by imprisonment in the county jail custody of the Department of
Corrections for a term not to exceed one (1) year two (2) years, or
by a fine not to exceed Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) Five Thousand
Dollars ($5,000.00), or by both such fine and imprisonment.
D. When three or more separate offenses under this section are
committed within a sixty-day period, the person shall be guilty of a
felony punishable by imprisonment in the custody of the Department
of Corrections for a term of not less than two (2) years nor more
than five (5) years, or by a fine not to exceed Five Thousand
Dollars ($5,000.00), or by both such fine and imprisonment.
E. Any person convicted pursuant to the provisions of this
section shall also be ordered to pay restitution to the victim as
provided in Section 991f of Title 22 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-11059 GRS 01/02/25

Req. No. 11059 Page 2